src/verb-kom-morph.txt
LEXICON VerbDer 



  ! verb-to-noun
+Der/ӧм+Event:%>ӧм Noun1 ;

  ! nonfinites
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger:%>іг K ; ! gerund (at the same time as the action)
!352 Pl
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl:%>ігъяс K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill:%>ігъясӧ K ; !345
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg1-ym:%>ігъясам K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg2:%>ігъясад K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg3:%>ігъясас K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl1:%>ігъясаным K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl2:%>ігъясаныд K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl3:%>ігъясаныс K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Pl+Instr+NoPoss:%>ігъясӧн K ;! 2000:359 
                                           !And Marina 2011-10-05 no Px
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill:%>ігӧ K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg1-ym:%>ігам K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:%>ігад K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:%>ігас K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl1:%>іганым K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl2:%>іганыд K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:%>іганыс K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Sg+Instr:%>ігӧн PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !Ӧнія коми кыв, 2000: 360
!351 Pl
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/моз:%>ігмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !371
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/сор:%>ігсор K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/сор+Instr:%>ігсорӧн K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тыр:%>ігтыр K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тырйи:%>ігтырйи PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !374
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/тыръя:%>ігтыръя K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж:%>ігчӧж PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !377
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/чӧж+Instr:%>ігчӧжӧн K ; !
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кості:%>ігкості PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !352, 379
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/коста:%>ігкоста K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ:%>ігкежлӧ K ; !393

+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxSg2:%>ігкежлад K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxSg3:%>ігкежлас K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxPl1:%>ігкежланым K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxPl2:%>ігкежланыд K ;
+Der/иг+Duration+Ger+Der/кежлӧ+PxPl3:%>ігкежланыс K ;


+ANA+Adv:%>ана K ;
+ANAA+Adv:%>анаа K ; !Adding after attestation in Komi Grammar 2000: 381
+AN+Der/моз:%>анмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !383

+Der/ӧм+Event+N+Instr:%>ӧмӧн K ;
+Der/ысь+ActPrsPtc:%>ысь Noun1 ;



LEXICON Verb-ynyDer
! verb-yny-to-verb
! The source stems have no stem vowel "ы", and therefore
! dervational suffixes come with an onset vowel

+Der/ышт+Dim@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ышт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!кольмыштны
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V:%>ышт  VerbConj ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Inf:%>ыштны K ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+ConNeg0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ыштны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@0@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ # ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>ышт0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ # ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ышт # ;

+Der/ышт+Dim+Der/лы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ыштл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ;   !!??кольмыштлыны
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V:%>ыштл  VerbConj ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+Inf:%>ыштлыны K ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+ConNeg0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ыштлыны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@0@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ # ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>ыштл00@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ # ;
!+V+Der/ышт+Dim+V+Der/лы+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ыштл # ;

+Der/ышт+Dim+Der/лывлы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ыштлывл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ;  !!??кольмыштлывлыны

+Der/л@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ыл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ;  !!тшӧктывны

+Der/лывлы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ывл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !!тшӧктывлыны
!+V+Der/ывлы+V:%>ывл VerbConj ; ! мынтывл - мынтывлан
!+V+Der/ывлы+V+Inf:%>ывлыны K ;
!+V+Der/ывлы+V+ConNeg000@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ывлыны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@0@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ # ;
!+V+Der/ывлы+V+ConNeg0@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:%>ывлы@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ # ;
!+V+Der/ывлы+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ывлы # ;

+Der/сьы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ысь@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !! вевттьысьыны
+Der/сь+Der/ышт+Dim@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ысьышт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!лэптысьыштны
+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ысьыштлывл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !!?? вевттьысьыштлывлыны
+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ысьыштл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !!лэптысьыштлыны
+Der/сь+Der/л@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ысьл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !!кутчысьлыны

+Der/ал@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ал@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!бергӧдчавны
+Der/ал+Der/лы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:авл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !!бергӧдчавлыны
+Der/ась@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ась@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !! бертласьны


!<!-- This far 2012-01-19 -->

!+Der/овт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:овт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!пановтны


! Stray verb forms :-о


LEXICON VerbDer-V
! Page 346 in the Komi grammar
+Der/мысьт:%>мысьт K ; ! gerund (after the action) !353
+Der/мысь:%>мысь K ; ! !353
+Der/тӧдз:%>тӧдз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !396
+Der/мӧн:%>мӧн PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !399-403
+Der/мӧнъя:%>мӧнъя # ; !399-403
+Der/тӧм+VAbe:%>тӧм PossessiveSuffixes ;
+Car:%>тӧг PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; ! 390
+Car+Use/Sub:%>тӧгъя K ; !387
+Car+Use/Sub:%>тӧга K ; !387
+Car+Der/моз:%>тӧгмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !



! 2012-02-11 This is a problem; олан-вӧлан, овны-вӧвны
LEXICON VerbPRT ! one verb, вӧвны 
+V: preterite ;
+V+ConNeg+Pl3@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ # ;
+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ # ;

LEXICON EMYSHT ! эмышт "is a little / are a few"
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3@U.CONJ-MX.IND@:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ # ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ # ;
 
LEXICON GER ! 3 lexicalised +Ger forms.
+V+Ger: # ;
